Illinois, session 104th, HB955.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Legislative Accessibility Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (25 ILCS 175/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Legislative Accessibility Act.9(Source: P.A. 102-897, eff. 5-24-22.)